Montana, session 2025, HB284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Montana university system investigation committee -- membership -- meetings. (1)
(a) There is a committee to investigate civil rights violations and acts of censorship committed by the Montana
university system. The committee shall gather testimony on the record from Montana students on any civil
rights violations or acts of censorship that the students have experienced or witnessed at Montana public
universities and colleges and make findings and recommendations for state and federal officials.
(b) The committee shall report in physical and electronic copy all findings and recommendations to
the president of the United States, the United States department of justice, the United States department of
education, the leadership of both houses of the United States congress, all members of the Montana
congressional delegation, the governor of Montana, the Montana department of justice, the office of public
instruction, the speaker of the Montana house of representatives, and the president of the Montana senate.
(2) The committee consists of six eight legislators appointed as follows:
(a) three four members of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house.,
One of the members two of whom must be a member members of the minority party and be appointed after
consultation with the minority leader. ; and
(b) three four members of the senate appointed by the committee on committees., One of the
members two of whom must be a member members of the minority party.
(3) The appointments must be made within 30 days of [the effective date of this act]. A vacancy on
the committee must be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 284
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 284
(4) The committee shall elect a presiding officer and a vice presiding officer.
(5) A committee member is entitled to salary and expenses as provided in 5-2-302.
(6) The committee may not meet more than three times and shall complete its work by September
15, 2026.
(7) The legislative services division shall provide staff assistance to the committee.
Section 2. Appropriation. There is appropriated $23,000 from the general fund to the legislative
services division for the biennium ending June 30, 2027, for the purpose of reimbursing committee members
as provided in [section 1].
Section 3. Contingent voidness. (1) Pursuant to Joint Rule 40-65, if [this act] does not include an
appropriation prior to being transmitted to the governor, then [this act] is void.
(2) If the appropriation in [section 2] is vetoed, then [this act] is void.
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
Section 5. Termination. [This act] terminates December 31, 2026.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 284
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 284, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 284
INTRODUCED BY C. HINKLE, L. SCHUBERT, K. ZOLNIKOV, B. MITCHELL, K. SEEKINS-CROWE
AN ACT CREATING A MONTANA UNIVERSITY INVESTIGATION COMMITTEE; PROVIDING DUTIES AND
MEMBERS; PROVIDING AN APPROPRIATION; PROVIDING FOR CONTINGENT VOIDNESS; AND
PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE AND A TERMINATION DATE.”